Arkansas, session 2025, HB1642.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2108(a), concerning the measures
assessed when determining a school's rating, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The school rating system shall be a multiple-measures approach
that shall include without limitation:
(1) Academic achievement on the annual statewide student
assessment;
(2) Student growth on the annual statewide student assessment;
(3)(A) School-level graduation rate or rates.
(B) However, a student shall not be counted as a dropout
for purposes of calculating a school-level five-year graduation rate under
*TNL250*
04-09-2025 14:54:18 TNL250

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1642
this section if the student passes a GED test during the year in which the
student dropped out; and
(4) English-learner progress or growth in acquiring English.

/s/Gramlich































04-09-2025 14:54:18 TNL250